Vermont, session 2025-2026, H36.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FAMILY FORENSIC EVALUATOR RECOMMENDATIONS
(a) Family forensic evaluators are mental health professionals who conduct
evaluations for the purposes of providing information to attorneys, judges, and
state agencies in child welfare and parenting matters. Such evaluators are an
important resource in the Family Division of the Superior Court in complex
cases involving parental rights and responsibilities. A current lack of such
VT LEG #379241 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.36
2025 Page 2 of 2
evaluators hinders the ability of the judicial system to expeditiously resolve
matters before the court in a manner that serves the best interests of children.
(b) The General Assembly requests that the Chief Superior Judge, the
Director of the Office of Professional Regulation, and the Executive Director
of the Vermont Psychological Association work collaboratively to examine the
following:
(1) the extent of the need for and geographic distribution of family
forensic evaluators in complex parental rights and responsibilities cases heard
in the Family Division;
(2) barriers to increasing the availability of family forensic evaluators in
Vermont and whether protections regarding ethical complaints are warranted;
and
(3) strategies for increasing the number of family forensic evaluators in
Vermont.
(c) The General Assembly requests that the parties listed in subsection (b)
of this section submit their recommendations to the General Assembly on or
before November 1, 2025.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379241 v.1